src/clock-sjd.lexc
LEXICON REST
%01@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@     AFTpunkt ;    !01:00 - 01:29
%02@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     AFTpunkt ;    !02:00 - 02:29
%03@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     AFTpunkt ;    !03:00 - 03:29
%04@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     AFTpunkt ;    !04:00 - 04:29
%05@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     AFTpunkt ;    !05:00 - 05:29
%06@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     AFTpunkt ;    !06:00 - 06:29
%07@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     AFTpunkt ;    !07:00 - 07:29
%08@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     AFTpunkt ;    !08:00 - 08:29
%09@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     AFTpunkt ;    !09:00 - 09:29
1%0@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   AFTpunkt ;  !10:00 - 10:29
11@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    AFTpunkt ;   !11:00 - 11:59
12@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    AFTpunkt ;   !12:00 - 12:29
13@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@      AFTpunkt ;     !13:00 - 13:29
14@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@      AFTpunkt ;     !14:00 - 114:29
15@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@      AFTpunkt ;     !15:00 - 15:29
16@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@      AFTpunkt ;     !16:00 - 16:29
17@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@      AFTpunkt ;     !17:00 - 17:29
18@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@      AFTpunkt ;     !18:00 - 18:29
19@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@      AFTpunkt ;     !19:00 - 19:29
2%0@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     AFTpunkt ;    !20:00 - 20:29
21@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@      AFTpunkt ;     !21:00 - 21:29
22@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@    AFTpunkt ;   !22:00 - 22:29
23@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    AFTpunkt ;   !23:00 - 23:29
%0%0@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@  AFTpunkt ; !00:00 - 00:29
!24%:%0%0:двенадцать            # ;      !24:00

LEXICON BEFpunkt
 %:+Use/NA: BEF ;
 %.+Use/NA: BEF ;

LEXICON AFTpunkt
 %:+Use/NA: AFT ;  ! 2:00 = göökte
 %.+Use/NA: AFT ;  ! 2.00 = göökte
 +Use/NA:  HOUR ;  ! 2    = göökte

LEXICON BEF
 31:двадцати% девяти%               TO ;
 32:двадцати% восьми%              TO ;
 33:двадцати% семи%              TO ;
 34:двадцати% шести%             TO ;
 35:двадцати% пяти%             TO ;
 36:двадцати% четырёх%              TO ;
 37:двадцати% трёх%              TO ;
 38:двадцати% двух%             TO ; 
 39:двадцати% одной%              TO ;
 4%0:двадцати%              TO ;
 41:девятнадцати%     TO ;
 42:восемнадцати%    TO ;
 43:семнадцати%     TO ;
 44:шестнадцати%     TO ;
 45:четверти%            TO ;
 46:четырнадцати%  TO ;
 47:тринадцати%    TO ;
 48:двенадцати%    TO ;
 49:одиннадцати%      TO ;
 5%0:десяти%              TO ;
 51:девяти%              TO ;
 52:восьми%             TO ;
 53:семи%              TO ;
 54:шести%              TO ;
 55:пяти%             TO ;  
 56:четырёх%           TO ;  
 57:трёх%             TO ;
 58:двух%             TO ; 
 59:одной%               TO ;
 59+Use/NG:минуты%     TO ;

LEXICON AFT
 %0%0:                    HOUR ;
 %01:одна%               1OVER ;
 %01+Use/NG:минут%     OVER ;
 %02:две%             2to4OVER ;
 %03:три%             2to4OVER ;
 %04:четыре%           2to4OVER ;
 %05:пять%             OVER ;
 %06:шесть%              OVER ;
 %07:семь%              OVER ;
 %08:восемь%             OVER ;
 %09:девять%              OVER ;
 1%0:десять%               OVER ;
 11:однанадцать%       OVER ;
 12:двенадцать%     OVER ;
 13:тринадцать%     OVER ;
 14:четырнадцать%   OVER ;
 15:четверть%                15OVER ;
 16:шестнадцать%      OVER ;
 17:семнадцать%      OVER ;
 18:восемнадцать%     OVER ;
 19:девятнадцать%      OVER ;
 2%0:двадцать%               OVER ;
 21:двадцать% %              1OVER ;
 22:двадцать% две%             2to4OVER ;
 23:двадцать% три%              2to4OVER ;
 24:двадцать% четыре%              2to4OVER ;
 25:двадцать% пять%             OVER ;  
 26:двадцать% шесть%           OVER ;  
 27:двадцать% семь%             OVER ;
 28:двадцать% восемь%             OVER ; 
 29:двадцать% девять%               OVER ;
 3%0:половина%               HOUR ;

LEXICON TO ! BEFORE
@U.TIME.1@:час@U.TIME.1@ # ;                !^N^
@U.TIME.2@:два@U.TIME.2@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.3@:три@U.TIME.3@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.4@:четыре@U.TIME.4@ # ;            !^N^
@U.TIME.5@:пять@U.TIME.5@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.6@:шесть@U.TIME.6@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.7@:семь@U.TIME.7@ # ;               !^N^
@U.TIME.8@:восемь@U.TIME.8@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.9@:девять@U.TIME.9@ # ;               !^N^
@U.TIME.10@:десять@U.TIME.10@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.11@:одиннадцать@U.TIME.11@ # ;   !^N^
@U.TIME.12@:двенадцать@U.TIME.12@ # ; !^N^


LEXICON 1OVER
 :минута%   HOUR ;

LEXICON 2to4OVER
 :минуты%   HOUR ;

LEXICON OVER
 :минут%   HOUR ;

LEXICON 15OVER
  HOUR ;

LEXICON HOUR
NOMHOUR ; !^N^
!LOCHOUR ; !^L^ 

LEXICON NOMHOUR                              !^N^
@U.TIME.1@:второго@U.TIME.1@ # ;                !^N^
@U.TIME.2@:третьего@U.TIME.2@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.3@:четвёртого@U.TIME.3@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.4@:пятого@U.TIME.4@ # ;            !^N^
@U.TIME.5@:шестого@U.TIME.5@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.6@:седьмого@U.TIME.6@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.7@:восьмого@U.TIME.7@ # ;               !^N^
@U.TIME.8@:девятого@U.TIME.8@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.9@:десятого@U.TIME.9@ # ;               !^N^
@U.TIME.10@:одиннадцатого@U.TIME.10@ # ;              !^N^
@U.TIME.11@:двенадцатого@U.TIME.11@ # ;   !^N^
@U.TIME.12@:первого@U.TIME.12@ # ; !^N^

! Outcommented due to Oahpa. Insert again ad lib.
! LEXICON LOCHOUR                             !^L^
! @U.TIME.1@:ovttas@U.TIME.1@ # ;             !^L^
! @U.TIME.2@:guovttis@U.TIME.2@ # ;           !^L^
! @U.TIME.3@:golmmas@U.TIME.3@ # ;            !^L^
! @U.TIME.4@:njealjis@U.TIME.4@ # ;           !^L^
! @U.TIME.5@:viđas@U.TIME.5@ # ;              !^L^
! @U.TIME.6@:guđas@U.TIME.6@ # ;              !^L^
! @U.TIME.7@:čiežas@U.TIME.7@ # ;             !^L^
! @U.TIME.8@:gávccis@U.TIME.8@ # ;            !^L^
! @U.TIME.9@:ovccis@U.TIME.9@ # ;             !^L^
! @U.TIME.10@:logis@U.TIME.10@ # ;            !^L^
! @U.TIME.11@:oktanuppelogis@U.TIME.11@ # ;   !^L^
! @U.TIME.12@:guoktenuppelogis@U.TIME.12@ # ; !^L^
